This story is a work in progress it is far from complete so there are errors (that I am working on ), if you find any please let me know that also goes for constructive criticism. This story will also be long at most I am only 5% done with it this particular part is finished plot wise. The second part will start here in the next week or so the only updates from now on will be fixes to my broken style/plot holes.   If anyone wants to make art by all means go ahead.



>It all happened so suddenly one moment everything is normal another the world is on fire and being invaded by aliens.
>The military seemed to be putting a good fight up as the aircraft and weaponry that these aliens were using seemed to be less advance.
>The only advantage that they seemed to have was their spacecraft which could bombard and flatten cities from orbit.
>The fighting went on for months with millions of causalities.
>The combined forces the world's military started beating them back.
>just as it looked like the world would prevail everything went dark as a wave green gas instantly covered the entire planet.
>be Anon 20 something with brown hair and green eyes.
>try running away but get instantly knocked out by the gas
>wake up afterward
>"Move you, stupid human," says a gruff but feminine sounding alien, or at least you assume an alien as you can only roughly see its huge form.
> you get up and notice you are completely nude, surrounded by hundreds if not thousands of other people in a strangely dark tunnel.
>ohshit.jpg
>I SAID MOVE!, says the alien who then pokes you with a stick that electrocutes you.
> you instantly move forward to where the aliens are directing everyone.
>it seems two rooms up ahead where there are very bright lights.
>they seem to be separating males, and females into each room.
>the lights go on and off every so often and as you get closer you realize people are being pushed into them and doors close like an elevator.
>immediately you try and run away struggling against the crowd of people.
>almost immediately you feel the pain of electricity running through you as a guard pokes again.
>You keep running as you feel three then five more stings
>suddenly three large forms tackle you pinning you to the ground
>"I WON'T GO WITHOUT A FIGHT!", you yell trying to escape from your captors.
> They eventually overpower you injecting something and immediately your extremities go numb unable to move.
>The last thing you hear as the aliens toss you into the light is, "this one is special put him aside".
>then you feel cold in its most simple form
>bitter bone-breaking cold as your consciousness fades.
>your next memories are vague almost dreamlike.
>everything is foggy, but you are under a bright light and you hear people talking.
>"inject him with serum number one and two"
>you try and reach out struggling against what feels like restraints
>"this one is mentally strong give him another dose of relaxacian"
>you suddenly notice a figure bending over
and you try and stop it brushing your hand against...hair?
> you feel sharp pains in both your leg arm and chest.
>everything becomes vague, and you can no longer move and understand what is being said.
>you feel more dull pains all across your body.
>Then the bitter cold returns and you lose consciousness.
>You awake to intense heat.
> it feels like your burning alive.
> something opens and you fall flat on what feels like a hard cold floor.
>everything is blurry, and you feel weak, but somehow you struggle to your knees.
>while you are sitting there, you hear a voice
>"My lady, this specimen was captured from the former continent known as North America", said another gruff but feminine voice," just shortly after the colonization, he put up a great fight during the sorting process even under what would have been a heavy dose relaxacian, and had to be incapacitated."
>slowly your vision starts to return and you can barely see what looks like stained glass, and stone?
> "during the optimization process they had to give him what would normally be a lethal dose to keep him from trying to break free."
Another voice chimed in, "marvelous, what about physical strength?
>you start to finally get up slowly as your legs are barely able to stand.
>the voice continued, Your Highness nothing to much out of the ordinary since the serum used is old it won't take effect until after the ritual."
>you are finally able to stand on your feet as your vision is nearly clear you look around and see two white figures seated in front of you one on a higher chair in the center and one on the lower chair on right.
> the voice from before seemed to be coming from the center "I don't know are you sure you want someone who won't be as strong as the other specimens?"
>the figure on the right chimed replied with what seemed like a younger voice," mother I could care less about a brute with no will power or intelligence."
>"knight what is his intelligence level measured at?"
>At this point your eyes are open clearly, and it looks like your in a throne room, with what appears to b...b ..be two nude white wolfesses siting on both thrones.
>The voice from behind continues and out of the corner of your eye you see a spear, still weak you wait until the right moment.
>"seven out of eight my lady one of the better ones of his kind", the voice replied.
>"Good, just what I am-
>Before another reply could be said you, went for the spear tripping the alien or was it wolfess?
>grabbing the spear you hold it to the throat a tan wolfess in weird silver and gold looking armor.
>Then you shout, MOVE ONE INCH AND WOLFY HERE GETS IT!
>Now the middle wolfess gets up of her throne and looks angry, HOW DARE YOU TOUCH AND INSULT A ROYAL NIGHT HUMAN!
> You reply," Why should I care? If you like her so much let me go and she lives if not..."you inch the spear closer to her throat.
> The wolfess calls your bluff, GUARDS SEIZE HIM!
> you are about to plunge the spear into the wolf's throat, but a guard out of nowhere pins and restrains you.
> you can somehow break free of their grip and turn to run, causing three more guards to pin you.
>the middle wolfess speaks again with supreme authority in her voice, "this specimen is not worth the time send him to the labor camps for the soldiers to sort out."
>The wolfess on the right speaks up "mother I chose this one."
>"Aurora why this one he just attacked a guard, think about what he might do to you given the chance," said the middle wolfess.
>Mother I don't want a human who will break easily, I want it to a be struggle, and this one will do just fine. I will enjoy breaking him down.
>"It is your choice daughter one you can't go back on, we both know what happens if you do," replied the middle wolfess concerned.
>"I chose him," says Aurora insistent.
>TO HELL WITH THIS I WOULD RATHER DIE THAN SUBMIT TO WHATEVER-, you shout before you get cut off as a guard gags you.
>"Aurora go take your serum, and prepare the ritual room, drag this one there ", as the middle wolfess points to you, "kicking and screaming if you have to ".
>two guards lift you as you struggle to break free again.
>Both seem to chuckle at your attempts to break free, and one even says, humans never learn do they.
>before entering chamber they inject you with a syringe full of purple liquid.
>they cut your bonds and throw you into the chamber closing and locking the door behind you.
>the darkroom is sparse with little to no furniture there are claw marks on the wall and a small bed with sheets and pillows.
>thisdoesnotbodewell.jpg
>Knowing you might not get another chance you search the room looking for a way out, or a weapon to defend yourself.
>nothing
>fuck.jpg
>well the next best thing you hide in the darkest part of the room and become as still as possible.
>suddenly you hear the door open and something walks through.
>you can see bright blue and green eyes on the other side of the room.
> I know you are here human, you can't hide from me, said the younger voice from earlier
>which had to be Aurora?
>"yeah so what", you say as you charge her.
>you try to knock her off her feet knowing she probably has the key.
>she simply holds out her arm and knocks the wind out of you.
>"nice one," you say sarcastically as you catch your breath.
>"You know your lucky human", says Aurora, "not many of your kind will ever get this privilege".
>"like hell", you say coughing still trying to get back to breathing regularly.
>with your eyes slowly adjusting you notice the wolfess is holding a syringe in her hand which she injects.
>"you wanna know what is going on you have five minutes before this kicks in", she says tossing the syringe aside.
>it makes loud clank as it hits the floor
>the first question comes to mind
>"Where am I?",
>"you would call it earth, but we call it lupus major now
> why am I here are you going to torture me?
> "No you have been chosen by me for the bonding ritual", Aurora replies casually as if its the most natural thing.
>The presence of bed and pillows finally hit.
> fuck no you think
>"yeah I don't think so", as you back away.
>"You have no choice", she replies with what looks like a smirk
>you start to notice a strange smell and the wolfess slowly advances.
>"you will thank me later for saving you from a fate worse than death,"
>The smell intensifies
> So raping me is better than death you think backing slowly up trying to get as far away as possible.
>as you do so you almost stumble over something in the dark 
> "Times up, "
> you try to run but she is on top of you faster than you think possible.
>she drags you to the bed pinning you
>"Oh gods", she moans, "I did not think it would be this strong.
>She plunges on you sticking her muzzle in your mouth where gaging you swallow some of her saliva.
>suddenly an overwhelming sense of eroticism washes over you
>that weird smell becomes incredibly fragrant and addicting.
>your member becomes fully erect, and as you try to resist the scent becomes stronger and stronger.
>eventually you give in letting her put her full muzzle around your mouth and tongue kissing you.
>you feel her hot breath all over your face
>"MMMMMM", that was better than I thought it would be, lets move on to the next step shall we.
>In your mind you screaming that this is wrong, that you should try to resist but unable to as a sense of want falls over you.
>she then moves away from your mouth and begins to lick your exposed member.
>"MMMMMore", you say feeling her soft fur rub on you.
>why the hell did you just say that, this is wrong
>the scent is overpowering at this point, and finally, after what seems like hours, she goes down on your member.
>the moment it is inside you feel intense heat, and your dick seems to swell beginning to fit her perfectly.
>Her pussy seems to fit perfectly around every part of your dick.
>the folds grasping around it squishing and making an odd slapping noise
>she then begins kissing you again as you now thrust with her.
>you feel the shape of her body, as every move rubs her soft fur against you.
>This seems right it is right keeps playing in your head over and over.
>Finally after what seems like years you release your load which does not seem to end, and she climaxes covering you in her fluids.
>the scent even more addicting now you lay with her as she continues to milk you dry with you orgasming over and over again.
>As you sit there an odd feeling of content fills your mind never had sex ever felt so good
>Aurora had you pined right next to her and the warmth was oddly soothing and extremely comfortable like a heated blanket
>Your mind is trying to fight these new instincts as Aurora starts touching you all over.
>You can't fight the instincts and you start rubbing her back and put your face in her fur.
>exhausted you then fall asleep next to your mate as its the only way your brain wants to put it.
>you awake with the wolfess on top of you.
>her soft fur feeling perfect against your skin
>you seem to be able to smell her scent with greater detail, and it is addictive.
>slowly the details of last night reach your mind
>you had to get out of here
>thinking she might have the key you slowly rub her down trying to find it
>her fur is glorious why not stay here says your mind
>"NO NO NO NO !", you shout to yourself
>Suddenly as if she reading your mind Aurora says," your not getting out of here until I say so."
>I AM NO-,   to reply as she kisses you again.
>she the grabs your balls with her paws
>she could crush them easily yet she is touching them in the most pleasurable way. 
>almost immediately that addictive feeling of wanting more washes over you.
>you try and resist it, but a part of your mind just caves
>what have you done to me? ,not sure if its a good thing or a bad thing your mind is torn between feeling and logic.
>"We have completed the bonding ritual"
>could you explane what that is, or am I just supposed to accept you raping me last night, you say annoyed
>I keep forgetting your one of the original humans, she says, and if I remember correctly you enjoyed last night.
>You blush remembering how you went along with it.
>"anyone would have, especially under the influence of the bonding serum", she continues
>"The bounding ritual is meant for royal blood only and consists of a wolfess and human man being injected with the serum, and mating. during that mating, their bodies are optimized for each other. There is a bonus of each other becoming addicted to their partner's scents. To make it permanent both the man and the wolfess produce a chemical that can only be transferred during sex, and is fatal without a dose once a week.
"That means I am stuck with you for the rest of my life ?," I ask realizing what just happened.
"Yes you are.", she says snuggling against you.
"W .. w...well then I will just not let you have me, a..a..and I will die", you say.
>"Are you sure about that", she says with what vaguely looks like a smirk.
>"well then try and stop me, "she says kissing you and once again going down on your exposed member.
>"MORE!", you shout surprised at what came out of your mouth.
> you put your hand on her boobs and feel  they are so soft.
>you realize its impossible to fight the urges much longer as her addictive sent grows more and more.
>giving in you thrust into your her feeling the soft fur rubbing against you, and both of you climax.
>"see I told you," she says panting.
>"could you at least tell me what happened,?" you ask panting as well.
>"All in good time", she replies," the walls have ears here, but I chose you for a reason"
>" I don't care I want to know now!", you say defiantly
>yeah right like I will stay here long enough to find out.
> as if she did not hear you she continues, "what's your name I forgot to ask last night ".
>"It's Anon"
>"Aurora," she says pointing to her self, 'But I am guessing you already knew that.
> You arrive in the banquet hall where a decadent table is filled with an assortment of meat raw and cooked.
>your stomach grumbles hungry after not having any meals the previous day.
>you realize that you have no idea how long its been since you have eaten...
>the older white wolfess from before starts to speak" Good morning my daughter, I assume the bonding went well"
>Unlike Aurora, Vlyria if you remembered correctly, was white from head to foot with what looked like yellow eyes.
>Aurora replied almost snarling, It did I got the opportunity to put this human in his place, as she roughly pushed you little.
>Good, I noticed you still have a gag around him," said Vlyria
>Yes we still have some dominance issues to work out, said Aurora casually.
>"well I hope he will be able to eat, it would not do to have a dead mate before you have children, says Vlyria.
>Trust me he knows how to stay QUIET, says Aurora emphasizing the last word while dragging her claw across your cheek cutting you slightly.
>she removes the gag," you know what happens if you don't speak only when I tell you to."
>you nod getting the coded message
>Aurora sits on a chair table next to her mother her tail hanging out the back.
>One moment your standing next to her, another you are sitting on her lap while she starts eating.
>Vlyria, sniffing chimes in, "good I can already smell that you have claimed him properly".
>Aurora hands you a smaller bowl of cooked chicken, and says, eat which you do slowly and calmly as possible as your nerves are going crazy.
>Aurora then replies with what sounds like a grimace, "I learned from the best mother"
>Vlyria then replies," well I would urge you to get over this part of your life as fast as possible and produce a successful heir, so you can ascend to the throne and be rid of any pathetic human, Goodness knows how many times I had to try to have one with the right temperament and looks."
>Aurora looks as though this comment affected her on some level, she clenches her muzzle and her ears pulled back slightly.
>she pauses takes a drink from her cup, and replies, Quite right mother I know how hard it must have been for you, having to sort through so many un-successful heirs.
>You slowly look around for any vegetables or fruit on the table finding none you continue to eat your chicken finding it tastes way better than you remember.
>"do remember that your attachment to this human-only lasts as long as you have no children, it would be a shame to tied to a species so weak for too long, also give him some of the raw stuff it's better for them," says Vlyria.
>I don't like what she is implying you think to yourself.
> Aurora clenching her muzzle again hands you some raw beef cubes, urging you to eat it.
>Reluctantly you take a bite and some blood squirts out, instead of it being nasty they taste great almost as if the blood adds to the flavor.
>continuing to eat slowly you find that Aurora has put her arm around you squeezing you closer to her fur.
>its scent addicting you wrap your right arm around her feeling she is extremely tense, however, she relaxes a little when you do so.
>It goes silent in the room as Vlyria stops talking, making everything feel tense.
>After some time you stop eating feeling full, and Aurora breaks the silence quivering a little, "Mother may I go and take my mate to my room we have some more dominance exercises to practice.
> "Certainly", Vlyria replies.
>suddenly you are lifted and being carried out of the room.
>the moment Aurora leaves the room she starts running carrying you in a different direction than the chamber from last night.
>"Slow down ," you say as your afraid she might drop you.
>Aurora seeems to eitheir not hear or ignores you.
>at the end of the corridor she starts climbing upstairs into a tower.
>She makes quick work of them reaching a large wooden door at the top and opening it.
>setting you on the floor she closes the door with a slam
Looking around you notice the room which has a large window off to the left and a bathroom directly ahead
the room seems to be colored according to her tail and ears with pale greens and blues.
"THAT FUCKING BITCH!", Aurora outbursts suddenly as you notice her standing in front of you quivering with rage and a hint of sorrow.
>"sorry my love," she says sitting down on the bed, "you shouldn't have to hear that"
>you still don't know how to feel about her referring to you as "my love".
>"You can call me Anon, you say
>"Ok Anon", she replies
>"let's get down to business" she continues " I am sure you have so many questions"
>"yes please no more staling", you say sitting down next to her feeling as if you are drawn to.
>"first off what is the last date you remember", she asks.
>searching your memory you come up with 
>"May 30th, 2020 that was the day when I got knocked out by this green gas stuff"
>she replies, the date now is April 10th, 2630 by your calendar.
>Your first thought is this can't be true, then as you look into her eyes the realization hits you she isn't lying.
>B..B...But how, why? What happened?
>Its a long story she replies sighing and here is what I could gather from royal records.
> you have noticed we are all female, and you have not seen a single male?
>"Yeah what does that have to do with it? your reply.
>Its the reason we invaded your planet in the first place
>long ago My great grandfather, was in war with a subspecies on our planet.
>we wanted to wipe them out, so while not being technologically advanced we were extremely advanced in the field of biology, genetics. We created a biological weapon that would kill any of these subspecies. It worked but mutated and infected every one of my species. We were able to cure it rather fast but the damage was done, it mutated several more times infecting everything on the planet-destroying the ecosystem. On top of that, we could no longer produce males of our race, and we ran out of mates. the destruction of our environment was slow and unnoticeable.
Knowing the disease would mutate and rebound on us we went into what you would call cryosleep, hoping our ecosystem would rebound when we woke up nothing was left except a barren wasteland. luckily we had a plan B and found a similar planet that was 300 light-years away from where we knew semi compatible lifeforms existed.Once again we entered cryosleep and woke upon entering the orbit of your planet. We never expected such resistance from your kind, and we were on the point of losing everything. At this point, my grandfather already old died as well leaving my mother in charge at the early age of thirty. We were taking heavy casualties-
>interrupting you say"but wouldn't that make her over-
"yes" she replied annoyed you interrupted her, "over 640 years old. We became desperate turning again to biological weapons, that green gas was a weapon designed to knock you out until we supplied the antidote. We made another even worse error, only basing it off two of your subspecies when the gas was released all but these two died. You would think that our pride would have been wrecked
almost killing yet another race of people, but no my mother declared victory and enslaved everyone. We again turned to our strengths and changed all of your females into that of our race, also messing with yours and our DNA making it possible to produce females in our race and males in yours and greatly extending your lifetimes and increasing your strength. To my mother you human males were a shame, as she views you as weak dumb and inferior in every manner, and was enraged over how close to defeat you made us, and that we must mate with you to survive. She banned anyone from exploring in the technological regions your race dominated, and turned what was left of your race into simply nothing more than breeder slaves. She had her armies set aside what she considered "prime stock" in cryosleep for the nobles and herself.
>finally with those last words everything started to make sense.
>>" the next thing she did was terraform your planet with the remaining technology we had. then we come to my part of the story, my mother when she turned 500 knew she was getting to the end of when she would be able to produce an heir, and knew that she must do so soon. This is when my father a man by the name of Tom was bonded to her, but my mother wanted a wolf heir and all he seemed to produce was male, then finally after 115 years, she conceived me. My mother was busy for the next ten years running her empire trying to quell a rebellion, my father and several other siblings were very close to me and practically raised me. He taught me all the knowledge of your species that he could remember, and never once cared that I was the product of an abusive relationship, or that I looked similar to my mother. My mother was so grateful she slaughtered both my father and siblings the moment she had time, she did it right in front of me, she starts tearing up, She was able to do it since the bounding only works on us females as long as we have not had kids.
> she starts crying, and suddenly you wrap your arms around her to comfort her.
>"you know what she said to me after she killed them, "your better off without those weaklings, your superior to any human". What she does not realize is that I am a product of the human race as much as hers.
>You push into her fur trying to calm her down, which seems to be working.
"that why is why your here, I can't change what my race has done to yours, but I can protect yours from further damage, my mother has been pushing that I get a mate for 6 years since I was nineteen, and I decided that while I couldn't say no I would get one that helps me right the wrongs of my ancestors. Your display of will power back in the throne room convinced me that you are the one. So I ask of you something that I have no right asking since I have already taken your freedom, will you help me overthrow my mother ?"
>you pull away thinking, about what she just told you, was she truthful? Just from her body language alone, you can tell she is not lying.
 >Noticing the time, as it looks like the sun is about to set as you look out the window.
>what could she gain from lying to you?
> you make your decision, "Yes I will," and an urge to kiss her overwhelms you.
> giving her a kiss on the side of her cheek your mind completely accepts her as your mate.
>suddenly you realize how dirty you feel
>"Aurora is there any place I can wash off,?" you ask.
>"Yes, of course, she replied, "I will have the servants draw up a bath for us"
> "us" You reply inquisitively
>"I can't just let my mate have a bath all alone", she replies.
>she pulls the bell next to her bed and two servants arrive one wolfess, and another human, both nude.
>"servants I would like to take a bath could you draw up some water for the big tub?
>they bow and hurry off to find hot water.
>you will make it a point to ask later if they have any clothes at all in the castle.
>Moments later you are in the bathroom you saw adjacent to Aurora's bedroom, and a huge tub full of steaming water and soap is waiting for you and Aurora
> you hear a splash and Aurora beckons you to the tub.
>once you are in Aurora wraps her arms and body around you, and starts scrubbing you down with the soap touching you intimately.
>the smell of wet dog grows intense but pales in comparison to the feeling of her touching you.
>she finishes cleaning you up with a soggy kiss on your face
>one good turn deserves another and you scrub her down as well enjoying the feeling of wet fur.
>getting out of the tub she pulls the plug and the water empties through what looks like plumbing.
> she hands you a towel and grabs one for herself.
>30 minutes and several towels later both of you are dry
>Feeling tired Aurora follows you as you get on the bed
>she gets inside the covers, and you follow her
>"you whisper in her ear I won't forget my promise
>you awake the next morning as the sun is rising to something wet on your neck
>putting your hand to it you find Aurora's muzzle resting on your neck drooling slightly.
>torn between cute or disgusting you think its time to get a start on the day.
"Aurora, wake up, "you say gently shaking her.
>Bigmistake.jpg.
>"WHAT DO YOU WANT ANON!," she says jolting awake snarling sounding about ready to bite your head off.
> "nothing", you say silently letting her nuzzle back up to you.
>rule number 1 she wakes up first
>After a few minutes she stirs, "Good morning Anon" she says joyfully apparently forgetting about the outburst. She rolls over and plants a wet kiss on your face.
>How did you sleep last night Anon? she asks
>"Best sleep of my life", you say 
> She gets out of bed, and stretches
>then a thought comes to mind, "Hey Aurora do you have any clothing I can wear?"
>she gives you a look of confusion," why would you need that?"
>"so I can cover my body, I don't like running around naked like this all the time", you reply.
>Aurora looks even more confused, why would you want to cover your body, its one of the parts I like about you Anon.
>while charming, you still want some form of clothing to keep you warm, as a castle is downright drafty most of the time.
>"well also to keep me warm", you say exasperated.
>"well I can keep you warm Anon," she says getting on top of you.
>"Just please Aurora, as much as I like your touch and fur...could I please have some clothing ?",You plead with her.
>"fine," she said slightly annoyed, then she smirked, "but you will have to pay me back later ".
>"deal," I said having no idea what that could mean.
>"so do you happen to have my old clothing lying around somewhere," You ask sarcastically?
>as if expecting this she pulls large bright white chest box from under her bed
>As she opens it steam pours out
>Inside it are... "My old clothing!", you exclaim.
Overjoyed you scramble to put them on
> you put on the underwear orange shirt, and khaki shorts moderately worn from trying to survive the invasion.
>you also find your shoes almost brand new and socks.
>as your slipping on your shoes you aren't paying attention to Aurora who is rummaging around in the box.
>B A N G
> you turn around and see her holding your fucking gun thunderstruck.
>first you check to see if she is hurt(thank god she isn't), she throws the gun down and quickly hearing voices, coming up the stairs you shove it back into the white box.
>guards enter the room with their swords and spears drew
>"Princess we heard a loud noise, is this human trying to hurt you, "says the guard suspiciously.
>at first she seems unsure what to say then says" I just accidentally dropped something".
"Are you sure ?" the guard asks eyeing you still
>"ARE YOU QUESTIONING ME"? she shouts.
>"no, says the guard exasperated, "but we are here-"
>"THEN LEAVE "she shouts again.
>The guard then leaves the room exasperated.
>as soon as your alone Aurora freaks out, what the hell was that!
>"calm down please are you ok?" you say looking more closely for injuries, I thought they would have destroyed stuff like that"
>"Anon please tell what the hell was that it almost killed me "
>you take the weapon out, and Aurora backs away in fear.
>you immediately remove the magazine and switch the safety on.
>"it's okay Aurora it is not able to do that again", you say calmly.
>Anon wha-, she starts
>"have you ever heard of a firearm, or gun, did your father ever tell you about them?"You .ask
>"you mean the myth of a creature that shoots white-hot metal," she says" My father always said they were myths ".
>probably because he never thought he would see them again you think.
>"this is one of them Aurora, how the hell did they not destroy it when they took it from me?" You say amazed.
"aren't they supposed to be like long black sticks that are alive?, she asks, This one looks almost like a black rectangle.
>The light blinks green.
"Yes", you exclaim.
>"ANON what is it," says excited now as her tail is wagging.
>"its a smartphone, and this gonna make our goal so much easier."
>"Really Anon a shiny black stone is gonna help us? , says Aurora.
>"I thought your father would have told you about things like this, you reply surprised
"it looks like he kept somethings from me to protect me if my mother knew what I know now she would kill me I had to hide that I was searching through royal records as well.," she replies.
>"so we have to wait a few hours before we do anything else. Do you know what I think is a good idea how would you like to learn how to use this? you say as you hold up the gun, and two pairs of earplugs."
> "Sure Anon but I would like to have breakfast and show you the castle first."
>"what about Vlyria,?" you ask.
>" she is at the capitol at the moment, she is there most of the time. she only comes back about once every month or so to see how I am "doing", of course, I will have to keep up appearances while I am in the castle if one word gets back to Vlyria that I am not treating you the way you "deserve" she will get suspicious. sorry, Anon lift your shirt and hold still," she says with a depressed voice.
>Before you can ask what is going on you feel her scratch your back.
>"One more thing Anon", as she cuts your cheek enough to leave blood.
>"OW", you say "a little warning first"?
>"sorry you know the drill" as she gags you again.
>She pushes you out the door past the guard, "come on you pathetic little human, and one more word and it will be your tongue I scratch of next ".
>Down in the banquet hall there is yet again more meat and not much else.
>Aurora un gags you with vague threats loud enough for the staff to hear.
> you are unable to speak but, still enjoy sitting on her lap eating, while she pushes you into her fur
>after the meal she re gags you and takes you on a walk around the castle to "rid those pathetic human ideas of escaping"
>you walk down the long corridors
>you hold Aurora's hand under the guise she does not want you to "get any ideas"
>You see long corridors and many un-used rooms for guests
> You eventually enter a large courtyard in the middle of the castle where a blacksmith and armory is off to the right, and a large fountain is in the center.
>you sit there for a while with Aurora just sitting next to you.
>eventually Aurora says she is hungry and you head back to the banquet for lunch
>surprise surprise, its just meat again
>After eating your head back up to her bedroom, on the way she gives you several good pushes and insults you a couple of times for good measure.
>once in her bedroom she un-gags you
>"I think that was convincing Anon", she says
>A little too convincing if you ask me do you have to be so hard pushing me?", you say rubbing your knees where bruises have started to form.
>"Sorry it has to be this way for a couple of months, long enough that I can say I have "broken" you," she says depressed"
>"could you be a little softer that is all I ask", You say annoyed.
>you reach into the white box grab your old backpack, two magazines, and the gun shoving them inside.
>"You ready ?" she asks
>"Sure we have to go pretty far away from the castle so no one hears anything"
>She re gags you and you both leave
>She leads you down corridors, and to giant spruce door.
>Just as your about to follow her out, the knight in silver and gold armor from earlier stops her.
>"Princess why are you leaving the castle, especially with this human", says the knight muffled from underneath her armor.
>"Why should it matter to you Sir Triant", she says sounding annoyed.
>"Just the other day this human tried killing me, I shudder to think what he might do to you princess given the chance", Triant says concerned.
>Suddenly a part of you realizes what an opportunity this is. How can you be sure that everything Aurora has said is the truth?Leaving the castle is a weapon no less providing even more opportunity."
>"I go where I want Triant and what does it matter where I take this pathetic human he may have gotten the drop on you but I assure I won't fall for such tricks", she snarls dropping the "sir"
>"Should I inform her Highness, she has ordered me to watch you, we both know how much you care for humans..."Triant says with an icy cold voice. "Why are you letting him wear clothing no less, seems awfully kind of you, I wonder what is in that bag?
>Triant starts moving toward you
>crap.jpg
>before you know what happened Aurora knocks you face-first on the floor
>OW!, you shout muffled against the gag
"SILENCE DID I SAY YOU COULD TALK!, raising her hand Aurora slaps you hard
>its all you can do not to hurl an insult or yell out again, all you can do is look angrily at her until you realize what she is doing.
>"do you think I care about how this human feels, I don't want to be reminded that we are forced to mate with those pathetic creatures, she says in what almost sounds like a growl," and as for that pack I thought I might go mushroom hunting if I have to watch the pathetic creature I might as well make him somewhat useful"
>getting up off the floor you follow Aurora as she motions for you
>Sir Triant stands aside letting you and Aurora pass by a sound of disgust in her voice she says, "Like mother, like daughter"
> You notice Aurora's muzzle immediately clamps down and her ears are back.
>>she starts walking a little faster
> she leads you down the main path from the castle.
>now leaving it you get a sense for how large it is
>she travels down the large cobbled path leading from the castle
>All around you are huge spruce trees where you can hear birds and squirrels chattering.
>after walking for a while she leads you off the path along a severely overgrown dirt path where after another what seems like 30 minutes she unties your gag.
>"Aurora what was that all about," you ask "Immediately, "what did 'we both know how much you care for humans' mean?"
>Aurora does not answer and keeps walking
>You keep trying to get her attention, but she will not answer, giving up you walk behind her quietly
>after what is a long long time she stops after you enter a clearing next to a stream.
>For the first time since she was shouting at the castle entrance, she talks, "Ok Anon this is roughly Six of your miles away from the castle, will it do?
>"yeah it will", you say reaching for your pack
>as you pull out the gun you realize that this might be a chance to escape or hold her hostage long enough to get some sort of antidote to the bonding ritual.
>loading the gun your mind is in a battle, you promised you would help, but how do you know that she hasn't been lying to you and is only gonna keep you around long enough to produce an heir and kill you?
>she is sitting in front of you one quick pull of the trigger and your free.
>but what if she was telling the truth about the ritual, would you kill her only to simply die next week?
>Why would she lead you out here with no weapon of her own?
>You had only known her for at most two days
>Do you have feelings for her or is it only the ritual making you feel this way?
>If you were going to do this at least you can give her the honor of seeing your face.
>as you walk in front of her she looks straight in your eyes, her eyes look red, and she is visibly crying.
>"I know what your thinking Anon, she says
>>"your right, I never fully committed and I have been battling with myself constantly, but look at me now and read my lips I will help you"
>she looks surprised
>"one caveat you lie to me one more time, and I will not help you any further, you can do what you want to me if you ever find I am lying
>"If we are going to make our goal work, we must be completely honest with each other deal?
>"deal" she replies still sobbing a little
>"just know its not your fault your mother took advantage of your trust something a parent should never do"
>"inside you head you gain a little more respect for her honesty, as it would have been very easy for her to continue lying to you and it was to protect you"
>she bends over to kiss you, she has more natural feeling than you do you think to yourself.
>"later, "you say fighting off the urge of the ritual" we are gonna take it slower from now on".
>"let us get down to business", you find 5 logs and set one on an old stump
>"I am gonna teach you how to shoot, but I must warn you I am not the best instructor nor do I have a particularly good shot, we each get five shots per shooting lesson when I run out I am out I will save one full magazine for emergencies, each time you hit five out of five the logs it will get moved further back.
>you then teach her how to aim down sights by demonstrating with your five shots.
>at close range you hit all of them
>BANG BANG BANG BANG BANG
> it is her turn
>BANG BANG
>Both shots miss as she is holding it wrong, you signal for her to stop and correct how she is holding it.
>BANG
missing again you see she was not expecting the recoil
>BANG BANG
Both are hits, your eyes watch her breasts jiggle with each shot it is hard to resist the urge to run over tell her to dominate you.
>it must be real feelings you think, you must never betray her trust as she must never betray yours again.
"very good, "you say "we will try again tomorrow"
" I never knew guns would stink so much and be so hard to use", She says despondently
"trust me you will get better" you reply, "if it stinks so much to you we should probably cover it up so the guards don't smell it.
"Oh how about those mushrooms? ", she asks
"Great Idea", you reply.
>so you start gathering them
"I never told anybody this, but mushrooms are my favorite food, my mother thinks meat is the only "proper" food for our kind. I only eat them when no one is around.
"how do you eat them", you ask as you recognize the mushrooms as portabella
"raw how else would you eat them", she replies
"seriously, you have never had them cooked?", you reply shocked half wondering if she is lying again.
>"why would you cook them? she asks.
>you notice some asparagus nearby as well.
>you gather a whole bunch.
>"Why would you Anon, and what are those
smelly green twigs you are picking up", she says annoyed you ignored her.
>this is gonna make her day
>you whisper instructions for her to tell the chef for dinner.
>"You want me to what?!?!," she asks looking you dead in the eyes, "Is this another plot of some kind?"
"Just trust me", you say.
>she asks several more times before sighing and saying "ok".
>You spend the next two hours gathering mushrooms and asparagus.
>you end up talking and getting to know her better
>You find out that her birthday is on May 5th, and tell her yours is on July 3rd
>you become so lost in talking you forget what time it is
>Suddenly Aurora looks up "it is getting dark Anon we should head back.
>Your bag full of mushrooms and asparagus.
>just before the main road she ties the gag around your face and warning you this time puts several thin cuts on your neck and face.
>It hurts, but it's necessary you tell yourself
>entering the castle Trian is no longer standing by the entrance and is replaced by a more bulky looking guard wolfess who bows as Aurora enters.
>Aurora walks to the kitchens, where a plump wolfess is making soup.
she bows low, "what can I do for you today my lady?"
>she pulls a generous amount of mushrooms and asparagus out of your pack.
>she repeats your instructions to the chef who looks flabbergasted
>"your meat stew is almost ready why would you have me do something crazy as that ?!"
>Aurora glares at the chef, "your Lady is asking something of you I thought you would be wise enough to respect that "
>she looks nervous" but if the Queen finds out...."
>"what my mother does not know won't affect you ", She says" I would also like you to attend so fix enough for you as well, it is about time we had one of our little chats."
>the chef nods and begins work on the mushrooms, and asparagus.
>returning to her bedroom you place the gun and ammunition into the box after stripping and cleaning it.
>you again take a bath it is hard to resist kissing her again as she rubs you down and you rub her down
>once you are both out of the tub she does not let you slip your clothing back on.
> "sorry Anon having them on too long is just gonna cause suspicion".
>"is that the only reason?", you ask annoyed.
>she looks at you dead-on "Yes Anon", before tying the gag across your face.
>as your being lead to the banquet hall you and Aurora come across Trian with her helmet off and she seems to take one look at your cuts and walks off with a look of disgust on her muzzle.
>as soon as you enter the hall Aurora forces all the guards, and servants out of the room and into the main hall out of earshot
>she then takes off your gag and has you sit on her lap yet again.
>"Monkshod! ", she shouts and the plump black wolfess enters from the kitchen door carrying three plates.
>"please sit down, we can talk freely I have sent the servants and guards out of earshot, she says in her normal happy tone"
>You look at her surprised.
"In the effort of being completely honest, Anon there is one other person who knows my real goal", as she points at the plump wolf.
"Anon is it", as she offers a paw.
>"where did you learn that it is such a human expression, "You say shaking her paw.
>" from my father" Monkshod replies
>"our father", corrects Aurora
>you open your mouth in shock
>"well technically adopted" she replies snickering.
> " around the time I was three my father found her one day while roaming the castle forest, after an exhaustive search for any sign of her parents my then father adopted her under the guise of a royal servant. Being a servant gave her much more freedom as guards, and people pay much less attention to her. This has allowed her to explore the castle with little to no attention. When my mother killed my father and other siblings, we were both horrified and wanted revenge so we made a blood oath to deliver. She discovered the royal records through a secret passageway in the kitchen.
The only other one is in her room. These are records that not even most nobles get to see and document my mother's crimes, and our people's history. I was able to convince my mother to keep her on as head chef which allowed me and her to access records my mother would kill me over if she knew I was aware of the extent of her crimes." she says, "after our conversation Anon I wanted to be sure that you knew everything as a part of our agreement".
>your not angry just surprised, its not like she tried to continue to hide it from you.
"Stop it, "says Monkshod embarrassed, "all I did was allow you to view unaltered history"
>"Aurora, "continues you are too modest sister its what allowed me to truly see what my mother did. Now moving on I want to discuss our plans going forward-
>you chime in, "why don't I just wait until the queen comes back and I just shoot her?"
>Monkshod looks confused.
>Aurora glares at you, "for the same reason that is stopping Monkshod from simply poisoning her its not just my mother we have to worry about there are several nobles, and powerful people who are just as involved as my mother, who would dethrone me the moment after.
>"Shoot her ?,Monkshod asks inquisitively
>"We got our hands on a gun", Says Aurora even more annoyed
>Monkshod gives an expression of understanding.
>"MOVING on, "she says giving glares at both you and Monkshod. " I feel we must form a group to rival that of these nobles in both numbers and powers, and we must do it with both humans and wolfesses to make the new monarchy balanced. I found in the records that six other nobles collaborated, with my mother that makes seven people we must eliminate and replace in total. Meaning we should have at least eleven other people involved for this to work.
Monkshod, chimes in saying "yes I agree."
>feeling like it is your turn, "How can we trust them as that is a lot of loose ends if even one betrays us its all over.
>Aurora replies" a fair point the same way I tried with you a bonding ritual, but I would like to add some more serums to secure loyalty and to administer it in a different way than what I forced on you.
>" how different?", a little annoyed as it didn't feel right to be her test subject.
>"if I was able to I would have given you a choice, had my mother not "accelerated" the time table by starting to kill those who I did not choose, "Aurora said with a hint of anger, "we bring in people who show they are trustworthy either by actions or have a history of being honest. They, will be given the choice to either join or walk away, Then one man and one wolfess will be chosen to bond ensuring loyalty to each other they must be compatible before bonding, then afterward they are injected with a serum that creates intense instinctual protection and loyalty to the "pack", and "pack leaders" as I am going to call it. which is another reason why I brought Monkshod. Do you have the two syringes?"
>you see her pull out two neon blue syringes.
Aurora continues" unlike last time I am going to give you a choice this will cement the deal we made earlier, its either a yes or no, there is no in-between.
>you think for a while.
>"I am guessing it also makes it impossible to lie to another member of this "pack"? , You ask, "and is it permanent"?.
"Yes on both of those Anon and it also would affect me the same way"
"before I commit, I want to know you a lot more, and I am sure you want to know me as well," you say "it would suck to be stuck without truly knowing the extent of our feelings and loyalty to each other before you add another layer that you can't distinguish.
>taken aback at your honesty Aurora looks shocked
"how long would you wait for Anon?
>"six months and I will gladly take it if what you said is true about humans having life spans along the same lines as yours, it would be rather short and I am guessing you would rather have more partners as well so we can develop a process of growing this "pack".
>Aurora seems to be thinking intently
"very well Anon six months, and no more remember our deal"
"I will" you reply.
>monkshod puts the syringes away
>"we should probably finish our meals before they get cold", Aurora says changing the subject, she nibbles the cooked mushroom and steak and asparagus.
>a surprised look falls over her face and she begins to inhale the food.
>watching her sister Monkshod takes a bite and immediately looks impressed
>You slowly eat yours still noticing the enhanced meat taste of your almost bloody raw steak.
>After the meal Aurora hugs you very tight, and whispers"thank you Anon".
>Monkshod seemingly hearing Aurora, politely asks you to please share any more tips you have with her.
>after the meal she re gags you and allows the servants to come in and clean up the food.
>you then are lead up to her bedroom where once again she curls around you for the best night sleep you have ever had.
>you wake up again feeling her muzzle against you neck
>The sun has just risen, and it is casting its bright glow all around the room
>you try to move away, but again she has you pinned with her arms wrapped around you.
>remembering the mistake you made yesterday in trying to wake her up you just sit there thinking
> you are so deep in thought you don't notice her licking your neck.
>then "ow!" you say as she nibbles your ear
>"Aurora were you just pretending to sleep?", you say annoyed.
>"why does that matter Anon?", she says mischievously and before you can stop her she kisses you.
>getting up Aurora allows you to slip on some clothing.If she had her way she would have you nude all the time.
>Waking up you notice the phone since it has been charging since yesterday is fully charged
>You turn it on
>As it boots up watches Aurora closely with interest
>as you expect no bars it has been over 600 years all the normal satellites will have either fallen out of orbit or are sitting above broken unreachable
>You open the lock screen and check the apps things you have downloaded
>damn, nothing useful just a few games, and a graphing calculator app.
>Then an Idea comes to mind.
>you break open the back and search for a small button on the back.
>pressing it the phone goes black leaving only a keypad and black screen.
>Aurora notices and asks, "What are you doing Anon"?
>"so how much do you know about smartphones?" you ask.
>" from what my father told me you can talk to people from great distances, look up anything you wanted to know, take a memory, and know exactly where you are."
"I don't know about 'taking a memory', but you can take pictures," You say. You are right about everything else though, but in its current state it can't do any of those things".
"why not"? she asks
>you struggle to find a way to ex-plane it to her.
>finding a way you ask "How, do you get information or news from a different place?"
>"well a rider or courier bird delivers it in a letter from whoever has that news or information.",She replies.
>"well this smartphone functions like a courier It  receives hundreds of "letters" a second when I ask for something."
>a look of understanding appears then quickly disappears, "well why can't you do that Anon?"
>"well the letters have to come from somewhere right? They have to be supplied from someone who knows the information, before the invasion, we had "creatures" whose job was to "store" this information and transmit messages. We had couriers who sat very high above us. However these "creatures" were delicate needing to be replaced or fixed every 5-10 years at the most, and a great majority were already damaged from the invasion. Not only do the creatures that "store" this information no longer exist, the creatures that "send" the information are broken and out of reach.
>She looks like she gets the idea she continues by asking again "so what are you doing?"
>"I am trying to give this smartphone more direct instructions," You reply typing a simple command, "right now I am trying to access the "courier" part of it. While there is no chance that any of the "citizen" creatures are still working there is a small chance that simple "government" creatures are still working as they were designed to last far longer."
>you press enter
>the screen pops up with "ERROR: INPUT NOT FOUND"
>figures it would suck if civilians could hop on your "top secret networks"
>doing more digging you find the code that is preventing military sources from being discovered.
>You remember an illegal hack that had been discovered on a "fringe" website filled with trolls, hackers, and outcasts just days before the invasion.
>It worked but had the downside of being highly traceable, the person who discovered it was arrested within a day.
>>of course no one had taken advantage of it, and the person who discovered it had been called "fake and gay".
>you type in the command from memory as best you can, Aurora watching with rapt attention
>It takes a good ten minutes to remember and several tries, finally you enter the command.
>"WARNING IP TRACE INITIATED" flashes on the screen you almost close the window out of shock
>Aurora seeing you jump pulls back a little as well
>then you remember how unlikely it is for anything to come of it.
>you re-enter the network search command
>"1/1 NETWORKS FOUND SIGNAL STRENGTH: LOW JOIN? (Y/N), flashes on the screen.
>"Yes!", you yell startling Aurora.
>"I..Is that good Anon?" She asks unsure
>you nod "it looks like I found one "creature" group, if it is used is a completely different story.
>you type the command to connect
>"CONNECTED TO HOST" flashes on the screen.
>you type the command for diagnostics
>MAIN SERVER: NON RESPONSIVE
>CONNECTIONS 4/30000
>GEOSAT 40, OPERATIONAL,SIGNAL:LOW
>GEOSAT 13, OPERATIONAL,SIGNAL:NONE
>GEOSAT 100, OPERATIONAL, SIGNAL: NONE
>SPYSAT 90. LIMITED OPERATIONS, SIGNAL: NONE.
>"So looks like a few geezers are kicking around," you say surprised any showed up.
> you are about to connect directly to geo sat 40, when "DISCONNECTING IN 60 SECONDS, NEXT CONNECTION WINDOW 120 HOURS:6 MINUTES: 5 SECONDS FOR APPROXIMATELY 30 MINUTES". appears and you are disconnected.
>"what did it say?" asks Aurora
>"connection timed out these "couriers" that are alive still aren't stationary and I have to wait for them to be in range.", You say somewhat annoyed.
"so we have to wait 5 days", says Aurora doing the mental math.
>"Sadly yes and while they are alive I have no idea to what extent.", You reply.
>"well we have other things to do Anon, you still have not given me my lesson for the day", she says.
>everything is similar to yesterday, the gag, scratches, and rough behavior, except Monkshod giving you and Aurora a wink leaving your food.
>after breakfast you again make your way to the clearing and again teach her shooting mechanics.
>She hits 5/5 shots
>moving the log back you hit all five shots again.
> you then scour the forest for mushrooms, and asparagus to cover up the scent of the gun.
>while talking and getting to know each other in greater detail.
>You find a wild huckleberry bush getting ready to bloom, along with a couple of wild cherries, and an apple tree making a mental note for later you continue to walk and talk.
>you again have steak mushrooms and asparagus for dinner this time without Monkshod.
>making a mental note to try and find something else to eat you are at least happy you don't have to survive on just meat.
>the next two days go much the same walking and talking, and getting to know each other better. You get a sense of how sheltered Aurora truly is in some ways, and how much trauma she has experienced in others.
>every time something happens that you are hurt or someone around her is hurt she blames herself. Even if you trip and fall while walking she views it as her fault
>She can have a mask of either emotional distance or naivety which you quickly learn is an attempt to protect herself from perceived emotional harm.
>This makes it hard to tell if she truly does not know what you are talking about when you talk of things of the world and from before the invasion.
>Around the third day the only difference is Sir Triant who seems to pop up everywhere you go, on your way to the shooting range as you have dubbed it now Aurora takes a weirdly winding route with several double-crosses and a river crossing.
> "Sir Triant,?" you ask
>"yes" she replies, "she has been following me all day I can hear and smell her, but I think we lost her finally".
>After shooting practice your amazed at how accurate she has become, able to hit 5/5 shots from a range of what you guesstimate to be 1500 meters. While you are still stuck at 500 missing all but one shot.
>on the fourth day you wake up and immediately smell an overpowering addictive smell.
>waking up she is already on top of you.
>ohshit.jpg
>"remember our deal Anon if I let you wear clothing you have to pay me back, she says mischievously, and you still are in significant DEBT."
>She immediately forces herself on you kissing you deeply you can barely breathe.
>The part of you that the ritual is affecting makes it seem right and unavoidable, but subconsciously a part of you untouched by it is growing to enjoy her soft touch and fur.
>She kisses you for hours all while going down on your dick, but not letting you cum stopping just before you release your load.
>"OHHHHH FUCK,!" you yell.
>"how could I not let my mate feel the full pleasures of my body", She replies
>she moves this way and that tempting your dick to release never quite letting it.
>eventually she goes all in you feel the heat in her loins and after what feels like years she finally lets you cum while biting your ear gently and licking your face.
>She does this several times, and you are surprised at your growth in stamina.
>All day you are fucked, and the part of your mine the ritual has changed grows with the desire to be dominated, and your subconscious can't help but slowly start to agree.
>falling asleep again next to her you wake up early on the fifth day finding she is already made a bath, which you gladly take with her.
>you then notice how hungry you are and you and Aurora head down to the kitchen.
Monkshod prepares a meaty breakfast that has leftover asparagus, you eat it but you are seriously getting tired of constant meat.
while your eating Monkshod sniffs the air and smirks at Aurora, knowing full well what happened yesterday.
>you can talk freely, and once again Monkshod begs you to pass on any more cooking tips
>you get the sense she does not like eating the same thing over and over and the steak and mushrooms were a welcome break.
as you go back to Aurora's room you quickly turn on your cellphone, connecting to the network.
>Aurora sits behind watching
> this time it is Geosat 100 you can connect to.
> CONNECTION IN PROGRESS
>then
>CONNECTION SUCCESSFUL
>SATUS
>CAMERA: OPERATIONAL
>GUIDANCE AND LOCATION SYSTEMS: OPERATIONAL
>DATABASE: CORRUPTED.
>well it is better than you expected
> you type the "find location" command and have it pinpoint your location laying previous maps over the live picture
>What it shows you is shocking, gone are the large oceans replaced by GIGANTIC spruce and redwood forests with massive lakes dotted around, many of the previous environments you are familiar with are still there they are surrounded by these massive forests.
>Aurora looks at it amazed, "Is this our planet?"
>"It is you," say shocked
>your location appears to be right above where
the state of Montana used to be.
>Immediately you start looking up directions to places of interest and downloading them
>Cheyenne mountain
>library of congress
>and several nuclear fallout shelters and military bases that you know of.
>all too soon the giant words, DISCONNECTED NEXT WINDOW 2 MONTHS 30 HOURS, 9 MINUTES, 16 SECONDS, FOR APPROXIMATELY 23 HOURS 19 MINUTES 3 SECONDS.
>Aurora curious as to why you suddenly seem so happy ask, "Why are these locations so
important?"
>"these are the keys to defeating your mother", You say Triumphantly.
To be continued have to go to work
"We should go know and try to get in there is one right nearby not more than thirty miles", You say enthusiastically.
Aurora shakes her head, "that would take too long and my absence would be noticed especially with how Triant has been following me around lately My mother might trust me more once she feels I have "broken" you but until then no."
>seeing her point you agree realizing how difficult it will be to find the entrance let alone get in, maybe you can find schematics, but this will have to wait at least two months you think despondently.
>suddenly you feel warped in warmth and fur as Aurora seemed to know you were feeling down, she had started reading your feelings with disturbing accuracy lately.
>"come on Anon we still have practice today," she says nuzzling you and despite yourself, you start to feel better.
>soon a schedule began to develop as days turned to weeks, each day you would wake up have breakfast and go to target practice, talk getting to know each other better, come home sometimes having private meals with Monkshod in attendance sometimes not. Every week the ritual also forced you to mate with Aurora, something you were becoming accustomed to as it seemed more and more a part of your life. As the season changed to summer things became a lot hotter Aurora and the other wolves started to shed their winter coats so hair and fur was everywhere, oftentimes you would even find it in your food. Aurora hot herself insisted that you did not wear any clothing, otherwise she would constantly worry about you getting overheated. As much as you protested, you finally had to given as you could see the worried looks she gave you every time you wore them. She had become so much more open to you about her worries and problems when you were around, and strangely so had you. The first two weeks of walking nude in the woods hurt like hell until calluses started developing on your feet.
You had stopped having gun practices as you were low on ammo,
> Now you and Aurora were mainly walking in the woods talking and finding new things for Monkshod to try in her recipes which had become increasingly experimental as of late.
>Everything was going perfectly until a surprise arrival by Vlyria in early June who felt that her daughter had finally broken you and that she wanted to give her a "final test " to see if her daughter had what it took "rule". You and Aurora had rehearsed before both of you hating every moment. The rehearsal constituted mainly Aurora making you act almost like a pet doing chores tricks and reciting replies to questions.
>that next day she walked you out with the same roughness that you were used.
>after reciting and doing all of the things you had rehearsed the night before Aurora stood in front of her mother," See mother I have broken as I have promised, he will surely provide an heir to the throne."
Vlyria seemed pleased," Very good my daughter one final test is all I ask.
>Aurora gives you the briefest eye contact, for as good as she is at acting distant being with her for the last two months allows you to see through it. she is worried.
Vlyria continues, "I want you to dominate him a good human mate is ready to please you at any hour and at any time."
Aurora hesitates for the briefest moment you have ever seen, and replies," Certainly mother "
>she is on you in a moment pinning you, as you look into her eyes you see the pain and fear. She hits you and forces you to lick her snatch. She is berating you fiercely asking things like "I THIS YOUR IDEA OF MATING" she makes you cum several times, and covers you with as much her scent as possible. She treats you so rough that you are left with scratches and bruises,.
>Vlyria pleased, says "you pass with flying colors now on to more important things", as she has the guards take you back to Aurora's room.
>Aurora comes back into the room at sunset she does not even look at you and is ignoring every question.
>she is looking away and won't let you see her face
>you move towards her and she looks in the opposite direction
>you put your hand on her face knowing that she is blaming her self moving her face to look in yours
>she is crying profusely
>"did I say that this your fault you care it was either convince your mother or death., You say looking directly at her.
>"B-b-but Anon", she says
>"SHUT UP IT IS NOT YOUR FAULT "you yell, and before she can say anything you kiss her.
"I don't blame you and I am the only one who has a say in that. You have respected my wishes and have taken it slow I know who you are. you are caring, loving, and loyal don't let that BITCH who is your mother define you anymore.,"For the first time in your life, you have been never so sure of anything "Take me I am yours"
>she gets on you again and fully accepting she kisses you pushing her body against you.
> she turns around licking your member, and you in turn lick her snatch taking in its scent and taste.
She is on you plunging her snatch on your fully erect member, this feels right you tell yourself, and start thrusting along with her. She bites your neck growling, and it just seems right.
HARDER!, you moan and you feel greater pressure, and after hours of thrusting you release your load.
>you fall asleep connected by more than skin
>waking up sore and bruised you find that Aurora is already up sitting on the edge of the bed
>she simply states "my mother wants a send-off before she goes back to the capital"
>you can already see her facade breaking
>"what if she forces me to do something that truly hurts you Anon how could I live with myself?", she says sobbing
>"you won't that is not who you are, and you can't keep letting your mother make you feel that way, whatever happens, know I will NEVER blame you." you say"it is her fault that the world ended up this way."
>Aurora turns and sobs into your shoulder, "I don't deserve you Anon"
>You embrace her slowly rubbing her back, not quite sure what else to do
>After ten minutes she pulls back
>"we should get going Anon", She says becoming distant again
>After Vlyria leaves a great weight seems to leave Aurora
>She is treating you more like a servant while in public, and not being as rough and no longer are gagged constantly
>guards look at you with less suspicion now and you can travel freely within the castle under the guise of running "errands"
>Later that week you decide that both of you need to release some tension, so you suggest using your second to the last mag for some "anger management"
>Aurora agrees, she finally lets you put your clothing on seemingly less worried about you overheating and it seems you have agreed. while in the castle, you agree to not wear clothing, but in turn, she must let you wear it if you are outside
>after so long without wearing clothing it feels weird to put it back on
>weirdly Triant had stopped following both of you around as of late, and it was a welcome change not to have to backtrack on your way to the "gun range"
>when you reach the clearing you set up the logs a decent distance away.
>You both take out your frustrations taking turns shooting a log you aptly named "Vlyria"
>Aurora seemed to be taking full advantage shouting things at the log but you were unable to understand due to the gun
"TAKE THAT YOU - BANG BANG,- FOR-BANG BANG -YOU BANG BANG BANG" she was yelling.
By your count, she had already fired half the magazine while you had only fired a few
>you were about to try and get her to let you have a turn when all of a sudden you feel cold steel on your neck.
>"one word and I cut your throat", says a voice you instantly recognize as Triant.
>You are about to shout to Aurora, but a sharp pain on your throat causes you to stop.
> feeling a trickle of blood coming from your throat
>Aurora stops shooting to ask you something with her tail wagging and turns around.
> She sees Triant and her ears go back and her tail instantly stops wagging.
"Well well well", says Triant with an air of smugness "it looks as though this human is not as tame as mommy dearest thought. I wonder what she will say when I tell her, and I wonder how interested she will be in that thing your holding."
>Triant..." Aurora begins with her fangs bared snarling.
>"A bit Ironic is it? That I am the one holding a secret that could be the death of someone you like", Triant says and you can hear the rage in her voice.
"Triant PUT him down", says Aurora giving a look that would surely kill if possible.
"No, I don't think I will. I hold all the cards, and I think its time that I show you how it feels to be betrayed.", Triant continues not realizing how dangerous a situation he is.
"Betrayal?", Aurora snarls "You don't know the meaning of the word. I give you one lest chance to let Anon go."
>this seems to enrage Triant further, Anon is it? So you are on a first-name basis with this human more wood for the furnace I guess. On second thought why don't I just kill him here and now?"
>Triant pushes the sword harder against your neck a fresh trickle of blood runs down your neck. You start motioning your eyes to Triant's leg hoping Aurora gets the message.
>She raises the gun.
>Triant laughs, "what's that going to do make a loud noise?"
>Not one second later you hear a BANG a howl of pain
open for some constructive criticism, also if any art anons feel like making art by all means go ahead.
>the sword drops from your neck with a dull thud
>Aurora rushes over to Triant who's helmet had fallen off and swiftly knocks her out with the but of the gun.
>She then rushes over to you
"Anon are you ok?", she says looking concerned and pulling you close to her.
"I am fine Aurora, what-", you start.
>"are you sure Anon? she says starting to lick your wound.
"YES Aurora," you say annoyed at getting treated like a fragile object. what is the deal between you and Triant? She said some things that implied you have history
>Aurora seems to remember what is going on around her, and what she did.
>"DID I kill her? she asks shocked.
>relizing that answers are the least important thing right now you turn your attention to Triant
>"where did you hit her Aurora?" you ask concerned.
>"OH MY GODS DID I KILL HER?!? ", says Aurora whining becoming more agitated by the second.
>"CALM DOWN", you say loudly to get her attention and again asking "where did you hit her Aurora?".
>she calms down some.
"The leg like you said, please tell me I did not kill her, said Aurora still somewhat anxious.
>you walk over to where Triant is laying you can see she is still breathing
>"You didn't Aurora it's fine she is just out cold, you start pulling off her armor which is very heavy.
>Aurora comes over to help you take off the armor.
>You see where the bullet penetrated near the middle of her thigh.
>Pulling off that bit of armor you start feeling her thigh for the wound.
>Aurora suddenly pushes you aside," I shot her Anon I should be the one to find the wound."
>was that jealousy you detected in her voice.
>"Aurora, I know what to look for you," say annoyed.
>she gives you the "try me glare" saying " I am touching her not you and that is final."
>she finds the wound on the outer part of her thigh, but she can't turn her over so you can get a closer look.
"We should probably remove the rest of her armor Aurora," You say moving to help.
"let me do that Anon you stay right there", she says glaring at you.
"But she is knocked out-" You start
"I am not letting my mate near someone who just tried to kill them, by the Gods if I have to knock you out too I will, She says exasperated.
>you realize again just how protective she is of you.
>after all the armor is off you realize that Triant is more brown cream color than the tan remember seeing in the throne room
>she seems to be about eight-foot tall slightly shorter than Aurora.
>Aurora turns her over, and you see red blood staining her fur.
>you have to get closer and be able to see how deep the wound is
>"you are going to have to let me touch her Aurora, I need to see how deep that gunshot wound is.
>seeing no other way to move forward Aurora lets you touch Triant Saying" FINE!, but you will have to pay me back later and only touch her for as long as you need to."
>Ignoring the implications you bend over and look for the wound it's a graze the bullet is not in there as you run your fingers through to make sure, while Triant shudders.
>you rip the sleeves of your shirt and place them over the wound tying it tight to add compression
>"She is fine for now but we need to get her to someone with actual medical experience, and we need to get her some real bandages as well," You say concern dropping from your voice.
"well, what do we do Anon I don't want to kill her, but we might have no choice.",She says pondering the situation
>you grab her sword and hand it to Aurora
>she continues, "well I can't carry her to the castle even if you helped especially, and if she wakes up we have nothing to restrain her with."
>"well we have to wait until she wakes up then we either convince her to not tell on us or we walk her deep into the woods and..., You can't finish the words kill her as you have never hurt someone let alone kill them in cold blood.
>changing the subject you continue, again asking" what's the deal between you and her Aurora?"
She sighs as if she expected this but had been trying to delay your asking, It's a long story one that started around the time I was 16...
"I met Triant while both of us were training for combat. Triant to be a knight, and me for my duties as the heir to the throne. I found that she was a peasant who had saved up to become a royal knight. Like me, she was raised by her father, as her mother had died during childbirth. We became fast friends training together and spending a lot of our free time together. Again like me, she detested the way humans were being treated as her father was abused constantly by other wolfess peasants, and it was all she could do to keep him from being taken and sold to slavers. This was one of the main reasons she had to become a royal knight as relatives of royal knights were protected from slavers and treated better in the communities they lived in."
>you think you hear a sound of movement coming from where Triant is laying, but when you look at her nothing seems out of place.
>She continues as you detect sorrow in her voice, "there happened to be a slave camp nearby where they were working on a road, and as we were eager to make a change we decided to try and free one of the slaves. We ignorantly thought that we would never be caught. We were able to free the slave, and we even more ignorantly decided to hide him in Triant's father's house where slavers were exempt from searching. "
>she starts sobbing a little and then regains she composure after a little, "My mother had spies watching our every move, and had known exactly what we had done. She confronted me and informed me that both Triant and her father were to be killed. Triant being one of my only friends I begged for her to spare them. She would only do so if I agreed to some consequences and to learn the "proper way " to handle humans. She then sent me to a slave camp where I was forced to work as a taskmaster and forced to severely abuse humans. I was only able to cope with the trauma by the thought I had saved my friend and her father from harm something I was unable to do for my father and siblings".
"I-I was wrong", she says trying to hold back the tears."M-My mother w-wasn't l-lying, when s-she s-said, that t-they w-would be s-spared.
But s-she t-took Triant a-and e-executed the s-slave a-a-and t-took h-her f-fathers ha-hand r-right i-in front o-of h-her.
>for the second time this week she bawls into your shoulder. After holding her for a while she coughs as if this was a and goes back to her distant voice from earlier.
"When I came back I tried talking to her and explaining where I had been and trying to see what had happened. She ignored and dodged me for a great while then after months of me trying to talk to her I was able to finally do so. all she would say is that "I never talk to traitors and those who abuse.". After doing some digging I found out what happened, but she would not talk to other than out of the formality that is required of a royal knight. So to protect her from any more harm I kept pretending that I no longer cared about humans as I did before. This seemed to make her all the more angry and bitter towards me."
>you remember the look of disgust on her face when she saw the "scars", and "abuse" Aurora was giving you. You are about to say something when
>"I know Anon you are going to say it's not my fault", she says eyeing you " and you are right".
but I can't help but feel guilty that a stupid decision resulted in this way."
>trying to lighten the mood you say sarcastically "Nah I was going to say it is your fault".
>she snickers seeing that your joking, "Oh Anon", she says hugging you.
>you hear more noise and Triant seems to be waking up. Aurora immediately gets up and puts the sword to her throat.
> you pick up the gun off the ground where Aurora dropped it after hugging you, and point it at Triant.
>Aurora speaks first snarling, "I don't wanna kill you but I will if I have to you have two choices either listen to what I have to say or try to run. Make your choice NOW!"
>Triant looks like she is weighing her options and soon replies with the most bitter voice you have ever heard, "Well I don't have a choice, do I? "
Aurora continues"I know you fully blame me for your father getting hurt, but that isn't the case I never once told my mother about what we did.
>Triant interrupts her yelling, "LIKE HELL IT IS YOU SHOULD HAVE KNOWN SHE WOULD FIND OUT !!".
>Aurora yells back in rage and sorrow, WE BOTH CAUSED WHAT HAPPENED WE BOTH AGREED TO DO WHAT WE DID, I AM NOT ASHAMED OF TRYING TO SAVE A LIFE. YOU ARE RIGHT I SHOULD HAVE KNOWN BUT I DIDN'T. I CAN'T CHANGE WHAT HAPPENED I CAN ONLY TRY TO PREVENT MORE EVILS. SO IF YOU WANT TO BLAME ME GO AHEAD, BUT I AM THE ONLY ONE WHO HAS CONTINUED TO TRY AND DO SOMETHING ABOUT IT!
>Triant just sits there and sobs for what seems like a long time
>Traint finally tries standing up still sobbing and you can see her wince from the injury on her leg.
>Triant eyes both you and Aurora It's obvious she is wary about what might happen.
>Aurora takes a deep breath then continues quite a bit calmer, "so I am gonna give you a final choice either you do something by helping me overthrow my mother or continue to pursue this pointless revenge against me, and I will gladly end it right here and now.
>Triant sniffles a little then speaks, "I will help you my lady... my friend ...I knew it was not your fault I even knew that you had begged for me and my father's life. It was easier to blame someone then accept my part in being responsible for a death and my father losing his hand. Please forgive my un knightly actions and if you see fit I await your dismissal."
>she tries bowing low but stops just shortly after before losing her balance.
>Aurora drops the sword and runs over giving her a brief hug
>Triant looks scandalized
> Aurora then releases her chuckling, "No need Triant all I need is your word that you won't breathe a word of what you have just seen and we have talked about to my mother"
>Triant tries bowing again almost falling and compromises doing a half bow, "I give my word as a knight of the Lupine Kingdom, those with no honor deserve none in return".
>Aurora chuckles some more saying," always the knight, let me help you get back to the castle so we can tend to that wound".
>Triant replies wincing, "No Need my lady, its nothing but a scratch".
>She then promptly falls.
>Aurora then picks her up it takes the two of you to carry Triant protests for a while then gives up after Aurora commands her to accept the help.
>Aurora does not seem happy about you touching Triant and gives concerned looks every once in a while.
>After having put the gun back in your bag you start back to the castle
>It takes a long time to get back to the castle nearly being dark when you get back
>The guards seeing Triant injured Immediately raise the alarm until Aurora gets them to calm down.
>The physician takes Triant away, and Aurora "explains" what happened
>"we were out mushroom hunting, and some bandits jumped us Triant defended and ended up getting injured by a weird knife. We had to take his armor off and carry her"
>The head guard suggests setting up a search party to find and execute these bandits. Aurora probably thinking quickly shakes her head and replies, " No need the two that attacked us are dead "
>the guards insist on raising more watches, and tighter security having two guards following Aurora around constantly.
>Unable to talk completely freely you eat a late meal and then head back to Aurora's room.
>You undress on the bed and Aurora pins you the moment you are undressed.
>" What the hell Aurora!," you yell.
> "I want you who to remember who you belong to Anon", she replies getting very close to your face.
>You can feel and smell her breath still heavy with an intoxicating meat smell from dinner.
>You mischievously grin, "Oh yeah am I? why don't you show me?"
>she pins you even harder and forces a kiss
>she teases your dick with her pussy.
>"bet I last longer than you", you say in response.
>With that, she goes down on your member now fully erect.
>Fuck its hotter than you could have expected.
>She is thrusting in a way that feels so good trying her hardest to make you burst.
>"Submit !" she shouts.
>"Never!",You reply barely hanging on almost at your breaking point.
>Fuck you can't let her win so easily, going all-in you thrust against her going as hard as you possibly can.
>she shudders you can almost feel her pussy getting wet.
>"OHHH no you don't Anon", she says moaning. "time for my secret weapon".
>she buries your face in her boobs.
>smothered and suppressed by her heavily fragrant scent she thrusts ever harder
>you barely hear her say, "who do you belong to Anon?
"you" you moan weakly.
>she thrusts even harder somehow, and her scent becomes unbearably erotic. "I can't hear you Anon, she says.
"YOU! I BELONG TO YOU! " You yell.
>Bigmistake.jpg
>You cum for what seems like forever as never-ending waves of pleasure wash over you, as she orgasms leaving you covered in her saliva and fem cum.
>She then stops smothering you, and you instantly pass out.
>you wake up sore and a little bruised from last nights ordeal
>Aurora is already awake and is still holding you as close as possible.
>You turn around and bury your face in her fur smelling its intoxicating scent.
>She is nuzzling your neck, and playfully biting your ear.
>is she your girlfriend or something more? You think to yourself. She has feelings for you considering yesterday, and last night clearly shows you have feelings for her outside those caused by the ritual.
>you sit there thinking about how close you have gotten to her recently, that can't be all a byproduct of the ritual.
>again she kisses you and says," Well we should probably get up and check to see how Triant is doing.
>She has the servants draw up the bath, and she is even more handsy than the last couple of times touching you in more intimate places
>You don't know whether to pull away or continue to let it happen as you like her touching you now more than ever.
>before you decide she gets out of the bath and starts drying herself.
>you do as well and decide to return the favor.
>as you are helping her dry off you make it a point to touch her all over, at first she is surprised but seems to melt in your hands not too soon after.
>Once you both are dry you head to the physician's chamber. It's a large room with several beds, with shelves filled with dead creatures some recognizable some not.
>Aurora talks to the physician.
>The physician tells her that everything is fine and that Triant was not seriously injured, however, she wants to know how Triant was hurt as she has never seen a "wound" like that.
Aurora sternly replies "I told the guards go ask them. I would like some privacy anyway to talk to Sir Triant alone."
Bu- The physician starts
"I SAID GO!, she yells
>the physician leaves with exasperation and annoyance.
>Triant is sitting up on the bed eating what looks like raw beef.
>she stops eating the moment she can see Aurora.
> you and Aurora walks over to the bed where Triant is laying
>"My Lady," she half bows, and surprisingly she bows to you "My Lord," she says.
>taken aback you realize that technically in most monarchies you would be considered an elite, but most people have treated you like a servant bordering slave. Triant being the odd one out.
>"Just call me Anon I am not special or anything", You say sticking out your hand.
>Triant looks at your outstretched hand confused not knowing what to do.
>You retract it noticing Aurora's slight glare making a mental note to try and bring back the handshake if you can.
"Ok, Anon," Triant replies.
>Aurora does not like that and seems to be slightly annoyed, saying "and for that matter, Triant call me Aurora we are friends.
>She sits down on a chair near the bed, you start looking for your own only to be picked up by her and forced to sit on her lap.
>Aurora continues, "so Triant how is that wound healing from the "bandit" attack?
>"fine m-Aurora, "she says catching herself, "the physician says I should be able to leave in a day or two. By the way, she was very nosy about what caused my injury."
>"what did you say?" Aurora asks suspiciously.
>"Nothing Aurora, only that you had "ordered" me not to," Triant says squirming a little.
"Good", she says suspicion falling away from her voice."
"I would like to know my self, how exactly I was injured I was wearing armor tested against the sharpest arrow, and that black box penetrated it like it was nothing ", She says not giving Aurora time to say anything else.
>"Anon could you explain this you are better at it than I am", she slightly annoyed.
>put on the spot you try and find a way to explain a gun
>well...um that "black box" was what we humans used to call a gun, "You say finally finding the words " it fires an "arrow" of pure metal extremely fast so fast it can penetrate your armor
>Triant listens then bursts out laughing, "HA
HA HA HA HA, you've trained this one well Aurora a "weapon that fires an arrow of pure metal" HA HAHAHA. As much as I don't like how humans are treated, none of them could have ever created such a thing the Gods made them the same time as us, nice joke though
>After a little Triant stops laughing when she sees that Aurora is not laughing with her
"I am not Joking Triant," you say
"But that is not possible like I said-"Triant starts
>" he is telling you the truth Triant, ", Aurora says
>"But the histories they say that humans were created by the Gods for us as we were all alone", says Triant even more insistent
>"All lies," says Aurora shaking her head
>"Your serious aren't you?", she says ears dropping
>Aurora then tells the same story she told you, and Triant at first is skeptical of her, but when she sees Aurora is being honest she seems to get more enraged by the second
>when Aurora finishes Triant seems even angrier than yesterday
>She just sits there
>You think you even hear her mumble, "un honorable bastards"
>Triant speaks up seaming to lose anger in place of shock, "So everything I have been taught is false. Why?"
>Aurora scoffs, "my mother is a tyrant plain and simple, she could care less what happens to either humans or wolfesses as long as she maintains control"
>Triant then starts talking nearly shouting, "ON MY Honor as a KNIGHT I WILL RiGht tHeSE wRoNgS, I wIlL...
>"Quiet Triant I get you wanna help, but do you want this to get back to my mother?",Aurora says interrupting her
>you quietly chuckle to yourself
Triant seems to calm down
>"we will discuss this further later, says Aurora getting up to leave
>Triant speaks up as you start to leave with Aurora
"Anon could you teach me how to use that gun thing as you call it", she says "as a knight, I would be remiss if I did not learn how to use any new weapon especially as powerful as that one seems."
>you try and think of a way to tell her that you have no ammo left for training.
"sure once you are healed," you say not finding one and hoping she forgets.
>Aurora gives you another glare then takes you out of the room.
>when you leave the room, she speaks quietly, "why did you promise that?"
>"I had no way of explaining I couldn't because the concept of ammo would be lost on her she already had a hard time understanding the "weapon". ", You say exasperated.
>"well you will have to train her now she won't forget.", Says Aurora annoyed with a hint of jealousy.
>ohfuck.jpg
>it being almost afternoon Aurora leads you to the kitchens for a private lunch with Monkshod explaining everything that happened.
>"You should not have told Triant anything other than what was necessary," Monkshod says annoyed
>"well I did not tell her everything, and she would have betrayed us already," says Aurora dejected.
> finishing you head back to Aurora's room unable to leave the castle because the guards weren't letting Aurora leave.
>many off the guards were worried about bandits, and outside general privacy were following Aurora around constantly.
>Given the events since yesterday it's hard to say if its suspicion or out of fear of another "bandit" attack.
>That next couple of days Aurora has you running "errands" back and forth to the kitchens and infirmary.
>these errands are little more than messages and information gathering under the guise of small chores
>Triant still seems to be healing but is battling a slight infection, You are surprised that with such little of the medical technology you are used to it has not developed into full-blown gangrene, but considering that the wollfesses manipulated genetic code and had created bioweapons to an extent that was impossible based on human technology it makes sense.
>Monkshod and Aurora were arguing back and forth on what to do about Triant. Aurora just wanted to trust her with all the info we had, which was unusual given how guarded she usually is. Monkshod was the opposite wanting to slip poison in Triant's food to make sure she did not have a slip of the tongue. At the very least you agreed with Monkshod in not trusting Triant. She had attempted to kill you and seemed to change her mind too fast.
>After arguing back and forth and several nights of Aurora not sleeping next to you, a consensus seemed to be found with everyone agreeing to at least test Triant further before including her in the group.
>Aurora and Monkshod were still arguing on what exactly the test would be until you suggested using the bunker as the test.
>It would force Triant to either betray or prove Aurora's trust valid. Triant would have to convince the guards to let Aurora leave for an extended period, and if you let "slip" that there were "powerful" weapons if she was lying she would inform Vlyria soon after.
>at which point Aurora could play it off as a "camping" trip and as a way to "test" Triant's loyalty to the empire and Monkshod would poison her soon after to prevent any more info leaking.
>The guards had relaxed a little it being several weeks since the "incident", but still, one or two would follow Aurora around constantly and would not let her leave the grounds without them.
>Triant was mostly healed but still had a slight limp in her right leg and still did not have her armor.
>Having spent those last few weeks stuck even closer together had allowed you to get to know her even more. She started talking about her brothers and father something she had always was closed off about when you asked.
>You had opened up about your parents as well, both of whom were while not horrible had little time for interactions with you, with your mother being in a high military command position and father who was an electrical engineer too busy with his projects.
>Though it had been fun the first week or two. Aurora started going stir crazy not being allowed to leave the castle grounds and had snapped at several of the guards, and once at you for no reason.
>Aurora had also taken it upon herself to perform a mating press about every single night, as she kept going into heat by being constantly near you.
>Suprisingly you had started to enjoy it more or less outside of the influence of the ritual, it felt good as you had never been this close to someone, and most girls before the invasion were good for nothing gold diggers who only cared how much stuff you bought them.
>this had prompted some odd thoughts
>Aurora as a Girlfriend? Hmph, I guess she is.
>Your only worry is with how much you had been mating with her that she might get pregnant.
>again more odd thoughts
>Being a father that sounds go- No, no no you can't be thinking that its the ritual talking, and it is not the right time.
>Luckly by this time Triant seemed to be fully healed and walking about.
>You were also able to connect with the satellites again and you were hoping to connect to spysat 90 to see if you could access any of the archived database information to make breaking into that bunker easier. Instead, you got Geosat 13 while functional everything was corrupted, and the most you could do was look at live camera feeds.
>The next window was 3 years away for one hour as it looks like the satellites were gonna hang out on the other side of the planet for a while
>just great how exactly were you gonna get in?
>Aurora finally Approached the guards with the idea of a "camping" trip
>at first it was a no.
>as expected
>they would not budge until Triant "spoke up" and offered to join as a security
>The guards seemed to be more willing to let Aurora Go after that.
>they wanted to send more guards along with her, but Triant talked them out of it.
>Aurora got a large wagon and two Clydesdale horses to pull it.
>she had servants put some wine and basic supplies on it leaving the rest mostly empty.
>You had also gotten your backpack with the gun, cellphone, and the last magazine.
>Triant had been pestering you constantly about training the last two days and when she saw the backpack immediately kept trying to open it.
>It had taken Aurora to not only command her to leave it alone but also her having to wear it herself, as Triant had taken to trying to slowly unzip it when you were not paying attention.
>You left the caste on the south road, which quickly turned into a rough dirt track a few miles away.
>Now being safely out of earshot and prying eyes you bring out your smartphone and look up the directions to the bunker.
>29 miles left
>Triant then speaks up tail wagging, "Where are we going?"
> You are about to reply
>Aurora replies first, " we are going to an old human site to try and find more weapons and supplies"
>annoyed that you were the one supposed to let that bit of info slip you remain silent.
>"Will I get any training Anon?" Triant continues tail still wagging.
>Aurora seems annoyed at the suggestion of training with Triant, and her ears fall back a little.
>"sure Triant after I get more supplies, I don't have enough to start your training and continue Aurora's, "You say touching Aurora softly.
> she does not seem so annoyed anymore
"But you said you would train me, it would be dishonorable to lie especially to a knight" Triant continues slightly disappointed.
>"I am not I just don't have the supplies right now, could you stop asking I will .",You say exasperated
>Triant seems disappointed and says "ok anon" dropping the subject
>The next couple of hours go by pretty slowly as you are jostled by the rough terrain, and the hot temperatures made you constantly thirsty
>there were several times you were afraid the wagon would break during the strain
>You end up getting to know Triant better she seems to enjoy being a knight even though she originally got into the job to protect her father from slavers.
>She started talking about the various battles she had been in and showed of some of her scars much to the chagrin of Aurora.
>Aurora chimed in with some of their training stories.
>It made the hours go by a lot faster on what otherwise would be an uncomfortable and hot trip
>just before it got dark you quietly checked your phone.
>5 miles, but it looked like you would have to get off the trail to reach the bunker
>you set up some canvas tents just off the road Auroras being bigger as it was built for two people.
>That night you only had smoked meat for dinner, but Triant brought out the wine and everyone started drinking.
>You enjoyed the rest lying next to Aurora and drinking while she pushed you into her fur.
>you think you hear something in the forest, but put it down to the wine
>later that night you head back to Aurora's tent with a pleasant buzz
>Aurora comes back sometime later obviously drunk
>"Heeeeeey Aaaanon," she says slurring her words.
>"hey Aurora", you say chuckling 
>she clumsily climbs on top of you pulling off your clothing
>This time she is having a hard time so you help her by undoing all the buttons and zippers
>once done she is still on top of you, and she says, "Do Youuuuu Haaaaave aaaactual feeeelingss for meee aaaanon"?
>You don't wanna reply but it jumps out of your mouth before you can stop it, "Yes Aurora I have feelings for you"
>"goooood, she says planting a wet kiss that smeeled strongly of wine, "dooo youuu haaaave feeeelings for Triaaaaant ?"
>when she asked that you can see the concern in her eyes
>"why would I Aurora? I hardly even know her and I love you ." You say kissing her back.
>she continues," goooood I doooon't deeserveee youuuu Aaaaanon, aaaand I caaaaaan't taaaake beeeing aaaaaaloneee"
>she starts crying into you "Its fine aurora I won't leave you ", you say rubbing her back.
> her soft fur almost therapeutic to touch
>"eeeeveeen wheeeen I haaaave the aaaantidote to theeee rituaaaal", she says then noticing her mistake says "OOOHHH Craaaap coooould youuuu foooorget aaaabout thaaaat Aaaaanon?"
> with those words a war raged in your head 
>she had the antidote all along, she had lied
>You look into those pale green and pale blue eyes.
>you see fear 
>fear that you will leave you
>fear that you don't love her 
>fear that she will hurt you 
>But how could you forgive her for lying yet again
>Would removing the ritual change how you feel about her?
>no it wouldn't you even admitted it.
>The truth was Aurora was the only woman who wanted a serious relationship
>she was the only one who wanted to get to know you for who you are 
>she wanted to protect you
>Maybe the ritual was a good thing 
>at the very least you decide to bring up the topic later. 
>"Of course Aurora I never heard it," you say.
> she then kisses you deeply now and then jumps on you
>Even drunk she pins you.
>you embrace her feeling the intense heat in her loins.
>she pulls you closer her fur feeling like a soft and warm blanket.
>you feel her slowly move down the fur rubbing against your skin.
>she sniffs your groin and you feel her cold wet nose pressed right up against your member
>she licks it
>You shudder.
>she goes down as you feel her soft groin fur against your skin
>OhHHH, aaaaanon she moans.
you feel her hot breath on your face, and feel her boob press and jiggle against you.
>she thrusts hard and fast bitting your ears and neck.
>you feel her soft fur and smell her erotic scent 
>You like every bit of this and you kiss her as deeply as possible.
>you feel your self cum so long it feels like hours, and her fem cum drenches everything.
>you try removing your dick, but its suck its as if her pussy is holding it 
>You eventually give up and fall asleep with her on top of you.
>You wake up early in the morning cold as Aurora is asleep on the other side of the tent.
>she must have moved in her sleep something unusual.
>Needing to relive yourself you slip on your clothing.
>its now a tattered mess with your sleeves missing and claw marks all over it.
>well nothing you can do about it now.
>You walk decently away from the camp, and once finished you head back.
>Before reaching the camp you feel the cold steel on your back.
>fuck not again
>"Triant I am not in the mood for games", you say thinking she was behind you.
>well it is not unexpected, you had expected her to betray Aurora's trust.
>instead a heavily accented voice replied," OI, Boss gets a load of this human"
>you turn around to see a smaller grey wolfess, and larger auburn colored one behind you.
>shit.jpg
>you slowly turn around.
>"yeah seems pretty stupid this one ", says another voice you assume is the boss "we should still be able to fetch a decent price at the slave market".
>what to do what to do.
>if being with aurora has taught you anything you can't win a one on one fight with another wolfess let alone two.
> you are going to have to run.
>"Bind him Drace", says the boss.
>Drace removes the daggar for a nanosecond getting ready to bind you.
>this is your chance 
>you bolt.
"AURORA!" yelling as you run
>you must have surprised your would-be captors as they don't immediately follow.
>You know that you have seconds before they come sprinting after you.
> "Oi BOSS he's trying to get away", says Drace.
> "what are you doing you dolt get him!", the boss says.
> you hear them running after you
> "AURORA!"hoping she can hear, You continue to shout and run.
> you hear you would be captors get ever closer
>the camp is within view one more seco-
>You are tackled and pinned to the ground.
>You then hear a voice, "Well, well here's something looks like the idiot led us back to his camp"
>You can't tell who it is as your face is being ground into the dirt making it hard to see and hear who is talking.
> "Drace go and scout it out I wanna take these people for everything they have, I wanna test out the merchandise."
>CRAP.JPG 
> you hear footfalls as drace walks away.
>"now that chase got me all worked up and I need to relieve some tension", she says.
>she turns you over
>You start yelling "AURO-" 
>"Now I  don't want any interruptions," she says ripping off your shirt and gagging you with it.
>she pulls off your pants and sniffs your groin, "Oh already spoken for eh I am sure she won't mind."
>you try resisting, and it seems to be working until realize she is letting you fight back.
>her sharp claws start digging into your flesh.
"I love it when my merchandise fights back."
>She forcefully kisses you and it looks like she is about to go down on your erect member.
>You close your eyes
>SPLORCH
>something wet and hot just spilled all over you 
>you feel that you aren't being held down anymore 
>pushing the "boss" off of you notice blood all over
>Triant is standing above you holding her sword now covered in blood.
>you look at the "boss" and she is lifeless covered in blood.
>"I am sorry it took so long Anon, I had no idea how many slavers there were", Triant replies cleaning her sword
>"No problem I thought I was fucked"
>"how many are there Anon?", the concern is all over Triants face 
>"Two as far as I know the other one is scouting around camp"
> shit Aurora 
> Triant seems to be thinking the same thing seeming more worried than earlier 
>"I need to get to the wagon I have my gun there"
> Triant nods and leads you towards it her sword ready.
> It takes a while as Triant ducks in and out of the woods.
> reaching the wagon you find it with the wheels destroyed and the horses let loose.
> Nothing was taken luckily as it seemed to be destroyed in an effort to prevent escape.
> finding your pack you make a mental note not to let it out of your sight again.
> taking the gun out you load your last magazine.
> Triant looking at it with a mixture of envy and fear. 
> both of you head towards Aurora's tent.
> Its empty and items are strewn everywhere.
> CRAP.jpg
> There are signs of a struggle as there are claw marks and blood 
> this is not good Aurora could be hurt or worse dead.
>Looking around for any other signs of where Aurora might have been taken you see a bright green vial on the floor.
>is that what you think it is
>without thinking you grab it and put it in your pocket.
>Triant does not seem to notice?
>was that really just the antidote you put in your pocket? 
>do I really need to-
>before you can continue Triant interrupts. 
"we need to find her", Triant seems more worried than before she sniffs the blood trail.
>"they went this way ", and she takes off running towards the forest  
>You follow her but she is running at top speed and you lose sight of her 
>"Triant wait up!", you yell trying to keep up
> Triant does not respond and you lose sight of her, while you can't see her you follow her trail of broken branches and underbrush.
> several minutes go by as you run in the direction Triant was headed  you hear shouting in the distance
>It grows louder and louder until you reach the voices
>You slow down and try to remain quiet.
>you see what must be Drace barely holding onto Aurora with a dagger pressed against her throat.
>Triant has her sword drawn and is approaching Drace who is backing away slowly with the still struggling Aurora.
>"Oi, one step closer an' I turn her lil' white coat red"
>"How DARE you un-honorable swine touch the crown princess., Triant is snarling "I am not without honor let her go and I might give the privilege of a quick death 
>You look down the sights of your gun 
>damn way too far away and there is no clean shot. 
"Triant you, idiot, he had no idea-, Aurora is cut off as Drace presses the dagger further against her throat.
>you continue to move closer looking for a shot
>you are still fighting with yourself 
>you have the antidote why do you have to stay?
>Aurora is in danger, and she saved your life before.
>Well you wouldn't be here if...
>"I don' remember tellin' you to talk crown princess, I wonder how much ransom money the queen will pay me?" Drace says snarling 
>Triant loses her temper and starts walking towards Aurora 
>you are now so close you can see scratches all over both Aurora and Drace.
>"I warned you now lil' miss princess has a new mark to remember this by" with that, she takes the dagger and cuts against Aurora's arm.
>blood pours out of the wound, as Aurora yelps with pain.
>Drace laughs "Next time it will be er' throat, inform your queen how you failed an' she might come out of alive for the right price."
>Drace starts backing up as Triant is sitting 
>any debate leaves your mind as rage takes over 
>How dare anyone hurt her
>You have never felt this angry before.
>feelings about her welling up unlike any you have had before for someone.
>Without thinking you raise your gun and fire aiming for Drace's head 
>it's a clear shot
>B A N G
>Drace Crumples
>you run over to Where Drace is laying and fire shot after shot into her yelling not realizing what was coming out of your mouth.
>"YOU WANNA HURT MY- B A N G
>"TAKE THIS" B A N G
>"AND THIS" B A N G
>you empty most of the magazine in a blind rage until you feel a paw on your shoulder 
>Turning around its Aurora 
>dropping the gun you embrace crying into her fur.
>You sit there for several minutes while Aurora is holding you tight 
>why did you just do that?
>your mind is berating you 
>You should have just left you to have the antidote
>Aurora is just using you to get what she wants, she lied to you and isn't honest.
>It is just the ritual you have to resist it 
>No, No no it's different you retort with your self its not just the ritual anymore
>this is different than the constant yearning to just fuck her.
>How do I even know that green vial is the antidote
>How could it not, remember she lied-
>NO! You love her that's the only answer 
>She only lied because she is afraid of losing people, especially someone she loves
>she is the only "woman" who has cared about you for more than just money or looks
>Thinking back on all the times she has protected you it clicks
>she has only lied when she is afraid harm might come of it .
>You want to stay its not a need anymore 
>You want to be with her for the rest of your life
>But she can't keep lying to you.... 
>I know, I know I will confront her later
>With that the protesting part of your mind falls silent
>You come to your senses when Triant speaks sounding apprehensive.
>"It is not safe here we have to leave who knows how many filthy slavers there are in this forest".
> Aurora gets up and you look at her wound luckily it did not hit any veins.
>its still gushing blood and needs attention
>Triant is repeatedly offering to help carry her to camp.
>It takes Aurora yelling at her to stop it. 
>But she insists on following behind with her sword drawn. 
>You can't really blame her as Aurora just got hurt.
>When you get back to camp you get the medical supplies and try you best to bandage Aurora 
>Aurora is all scratched up and keeps trying to get you to touch more intimate places.
>At the moment your not in the mood as you are still pissed about her lying to you.
>she gives up after a while with look of exasperation and confusion
>Once all bandaged, as a group you survey the damage to the camp.
>Aurora's tent is all but destroyed and the wagon is completely unfixable.
>some of the supplies appeared to be missing as well and as Drace and the "boss" did not have them on their person it did not bode well for the safety of the camp.
>"well crap that makes leaving a pain" You chime in kicking the wagon in disgust.
> You still wanted to access that bunker, but being taken by a slaver was the last thing you needed.
>"I would not suggest it as its dangerous in a wagon let alone on foot " Triant replies still concerned. "We need a plan first before I risk the lives of Aurora and yo-"
>"I think we stay at this point" Aurora interrupts "if that bunker has human artifacts we need it if only to protect ourselves as we leave."
(New)
>"But- starts Triant
>Aurora glares at her shutting down any argument.
>"Aurora" you speak up " You have already been hurt as a result of coming after something which I suggested. This is too dangerous and I would-
>"when has it not been dangerous?" Aurora interrupts with what sounds like annoyance. "we are trying to setup a rebellion and when has the threat of death not been apart of that? Anon are you saying that there are no possible artifacts in that bunker, and we are wasting our time and endangering our lives for nothing?"
> NO I just don't-
> She cuts you off again saying "then we are staying until we get access to that bunker."
> You realize she is just as determined as you if not more to see this through
> Ok Aurora then we stay.
> the next four or five hours consist of cleaning up the camp and burying the bodies of Drace and the "boss" something which Triant suggested to deter anyone from just stumbling on the camp.
>Triant moved her tent right next to Aurora's
>You and Aurora attempt to fix the tent from the canvas left over from the wagon , while Triant move the remaining supplies off the wagon to nearby the tent.
>Triant seems less than happy with the decision to stay, and is not talking to you and Aurora only nodding when you thank her for earlier.
>Before You know it its night again having spent most of your time cleaning up camp.
>Triant has had her sword next to her all day and its hard not to notice how uptight she is .
> Following her lead you decide to keep your gun out with whatever bullets you have left just in case. 
>Dinner rolls around and unlike last night everyone agrees not to make a fire as that would draw more attention to the camp.
>without fire its a meager meal with only foraged edibles and smoked meat from the supplies.
>The wine is mysteriously missing and considering it had been there when Triant was moving supplies you suspected that she had taken the opportunity to get rid of it.
>No one seemed ready to talk as Aurora sat opposite of you pouting about you rejecting her advances today.
>You wanted to go over and just kiss her, love her ,and just plain fuck her.
>well she had lied and you needed to talk to her before letting your self show how you truly felt .
>Triant had been moody all day and was just looking at her food not eating it. 
>the silence is uncomfortable
>just as you are about to say something Aurora gets up and leaves for the tent 
>You and Triant follow almost immediately 
> Before heading in you say goodnight to Triant who is standing guard by her tent 
>Again she nods, but does not say anything.
>Entering Aurora is looking around for something pulling open pouches and boxes inside the tent.
>You realize she is looking for the antidote
>pulling it out of your pocket you begin to speak 
>"looking for this?" 
>she turns around to see  you holding the small vial.
>"yes than-" she stops talking realizing what you holding as her ears fold down and her tail clamps against her.
>"Why would you lie to me about there being an antidote?"
>"Well I... I ... , she stutters not wanting to say anything 
"was afraid you would leave me?", You reply finishing her sentence.
>She nods surprised you guessed her reasoning .
>You start moving close to her 
>"You were right I might have earlier, but not know that I know you better."
>You move even closer and she bends down to get close to your face as if almost expecting what happens next.
>"But I LOVE you and I no longer care about the ritual just don't lie to me anymore 
>You smash the vial against the ground ,and before she can say anything you lean in and kiss her
>any mental walls you have put up against the ritual's influence shatter just as the vial did as you deeply kiss her feeling her long tongue and loving every inch of her canine mouth.
>after a while you pull back for air and you notice the HUGE erection making a tent in your shorts.
>She notices it too 
>R I P P P P
>Looking down you notice your shorts are shredded and are now in a clump on the tent floor.
>"at least let me get them off Aurora" you say annoyed quickly bending down to take your underwear off before she has a chance to shred those as well.
>Once you look up your presented with a little bit of a shock her pussy is in plain view red swollen and dripping with fem cum
>It pulses as if begging you to engage it.
"well don't leave me hanging Anon , as her tail is wagging 
>Instinct kicks in as you bury your face into it smelling deeply 
>Its an odd smell, but one you can never get enough of.
>Without thinking you begin licking every fold of her pussy 
>the taste also weirdly addicting as well.
>She shudders moaning ,"annnnnonnn",and a fresh wave of fem cum hits your face.
>wiping it off you begin to mount her thrusting your dick into the raging inferno that is her loins.
>as you thrust you feel her sides clampdown on your member her folds griping it tightly a soft slapping noise as you thrust .
>Prip
>you feel as though you can feel every part of her as she moves in tandem with your thrusts.
>Prip
>you must breed her is the thought playing in your head over and over.
>Yesssss you reply enjoying the bliss of this moment.
>its getting close you can feel it.
>Prip
>her moans getting louder and louder by the second.
>at last you let loose a thick cord of cum
>She then orgasms as you feel a waterfall of fluids
>"Keep going Anon" she pants
>You keep thrusting and cord after cord of cum shoots into her 
>Its the best feeling in the world as her fur and tail continues to rub up against you 
>holding her firm breasts as you continue to thrust
>Eventually you start drawing blanks and pull out.
>Both of you lay next to each other exhausted and panting 
>after a while you turn to face her as she does you.
>her striking pale blue/green eyes are so beautiful
>you kiss her again long and passionately, and she kisses you back 
>After a while you pull back and she embraces you her warm fur comforting and soft
>"I love you Aurora and I want to be with you for the rest of my life", you whisper to her as you rub her back.
> "and I want the same my love", replying with almost a murmur as she nuzzles you.
> you press your face in between her breasts taking in her distinctive scent and enjoying every minute of it.
> you feel her hold you tightly against her body. 
> She then whispers in your ear, "before you so rudely interrupted me I was going to tell you that the green vial wasn't the antidote"
>pulling your face out "what do you mean Aurora ?"
>She gets even closer to your face with a smirk,"that was to prevent me from becoming pregnant"
>CRAP.JPEG
>at first concern about having kids floods your mind as questions
>What would this mean if she did get pregnant would Vlyria simply kill you or have Aurora do it?
>You found it hard to believe that Aurora would simply allow that to happen, but Vlyria seemed able to manipulate and contrive to get what she wanted.
>What would happen if there were complications?
>this inner dialog is interrupted as Aurora speaks
>"are you ok Anon?"
>"I am fine , just worried about ...
>Aurora kisses you as if reading your mind yet again
>as she does so any concerns fall away 
>Its something you will not have to deal with alone and something you have to admit to yourself that you want.
>Tired you eventually pull out of the kiss and lay down.
>as she wraps herself around you slowly fall asleep in her warm embrace.
>your dreamless sleep is interrupted by a loud noise and shaking.
>"My lady wake up  we have to go "
>you recognize Triant's voice and their is a tone of alarm 
>"Not now Triant its early in the morning what could possibly..., Aurora is groaning with annoyance 
> "GET UP , its the slavers it seems they have come back in greater numbers"
>at hearing this Aurora seems to bolt up at attention
> well we can still fight them...
> No I can smell upwards of twelve they outnumber us 
> Aurora sniffs the air as well and looks crest fallen
>How far are  they ?
>not far says Triant 
> getting up you get the gun you had left near the bed and quickly slip on the tattered remains of your pants an shoes.
> 6 bullets.
> I agree with Triant I have six bullets left not nearly enough to even think about fighting 
>you can hear footsteps in the distance and twigs cracking, if you can hear it you wonder just how much more Aurora and Triant are hearing.
> We need to leave Now ! Triant says supreme urgency in her voice.
> "ok lets go" Aurora replies with steely determination 
> it was a smart move putting all the supplies near the tent.
>You grab your bag and stuff as much food and tools as you think necessary
>water skins , and smoked meat
>Triant and Aurora do the same with what looks to be larger rucksacks
>The noises from the approaching slavers are getting closer and closer.
> We should go  they sound like they are almost on top of us, You whisper as you stop taking supplies and start heading for the thicker part of the forest.
>Just one more thing , whispers triant 
>she takes a flint and steel and you see sparks as the tent catches on fire 
>without a word all of you make a direct run towards the forest.
>to be continued in part 2
